Utah statutes.
53-9-112.   Issuance of license and identification card to applicant --
License period -- Expiration of application -- Transfer of license prohibited.
(1)  The commissioner shall issue a license to an applicant who complies with
the provisions of this chapter.  Each license issued under this chapter shall:
(a)  contain the name and address of the licensee and the number of the
license, its agency, registrant, or apprentice license designation; and
(b)  be issued for a period of two years.
(2)  On the issuance of a license, an identification card shall:
(a)  be issued without charge to the licensee; and
(b)  state on its face whether the bearer holds an agency, registrant, or
apprentice license.
(3) (a) A registrant identification card shall state that the licensee is
under the direction of a licensed agency and may not do investigative work
independently for the public.
(b)  An apprentice identification card shall state that the licensee is under
the direct supervision of a licensed agency and may not do investigative work
independently for the public.
(4)  Upon request by any person, the licensee shall immediately identify the
name, business address, and phone number of the licensed agency for which the
licensee is an employee or independent contractor.
(5) (a)  On notification by the commissioner to an applicant that the license
is not complete, or is not ready for issuance pending additional information,
the applicant shall complete the application process and provide the
additional information within 90 days.
(b)  Failure to complete the process shall result in the application being
cancelled and all fees forfeited.
(c)  Subsequent application by the same applicant requires the payment of all
application and license fees prescribed in Section 53-9-111.
(6)  A licensee shall notify the commissioner of any change in the name or
address of his business within 60 days of the change and failure to so notify
will result in the automatic suspension of the license.  To relieve the
suspension, the licensee must apply for reinstatement and pay the fee
prescribed in Section 53-9-111.
(7)  A license issued under this chapter is not transferable or assignable.
